Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2284
Probation or parole; revocation; conditions.

If the defendant is placed on probation or paroled, the court may revoke probation, and the Board of Parole may revoke parole if the defendant fails to comply with the restitution order. In determining whether to revoke probation or parole, the court or Board of Parole shall consider the defendant's earning ability and financial resources, the willfulness of the defendant's failure to pay, and any special circumstances affecting the defendant's ability to pay. Probation or parole may not be revoked unless noncompliance with the restitution order is attributable to an intentional refusal to obey the order or a failure to make a good faith effort to comply with the order.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 5.